Louisiana, session 2026, SB243.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:851.29 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§851.29. Enforcement
It shall be the duty and responsibility of every wildlife agent and peace
officer of this state and its subdivisions to enforce the provisions of this Part, and in
the exercise thereof, they are hereby. However, no officer is authorized to perform
a vessel stop and or board any vessel for the purpose of addressing inquiries to those
on board, requiring appropriate proof of identification therefrom, examining the
certificate of numbers issued under this Part or in the absence of such certificate
requiring appropriate proof of identification of the owner or operator of the vessel,
and in addition, examining such vessel for compliance with enforcing the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-174 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 243
provisions of this Part, unless the officer reasonably suspects that a violation of
this Part has occurred or is occurring. Officers so boarding any vessel shall first
identify themselves and such officer in the performance of his duties shall be without
liability for trespass.